New Mexico, session 2026, SB95.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. A new section of the Human Rights Act is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] ANTISEMITIC DISCRIMINATION PROHIBITION.-- A. As used in this section, "antisemitic" means a certain perception of Jewish people, which may be expressed as hatred toward Jewish people, including rhetorical and physical manifestations that are directed toward Jewish people, or non-Jewish people who are perceived to be Jewish, and their property, or toward Jewish community institutions or religious facilities. B. A person, employer, labor organization, employment agency, public accommodation, public body or any officer, employee or contractor of a public body shall not engage in antisemitic discrimination and shall comply with the prohibitions on discrimination provided in the Human Rights Act. A person claiming to be aggrieved by an unlawful discriminatory practice based on antisemitic discrimination may file a claim in accordance with the Human Rights Act." - 2 -